Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-39] Collection of specimen from sex
offense registrants. (a) If a person, except for any juvenile, is
convicted of, pleads guilty or no contest to, or is found not guilty by reason
of insanity of any of the offenses requiring registration pursuant to chapter
846E, and has given a blood specimen or other biological sample or samples to
law enforcement for any purpose, the department is authorized to analyze, or
direct a designated entity to analyze, the blood specimen and other biological
sample or samples for forensic identification markers, including DNA markers,
and to include the DNA and forensic identification profiles from these
specimens and samples in the state DNA database and data bank identification
program.

(b) This section applies whether or not the
blood specimen or other biological sample originally was collected from a
sexual offender pursuant to the State's DNA and forensic identification
database and data bank program, and whether or not the crime committed predated
the enactment of the State's DNA and forensic identification database and data
bank program, or any amendments thereto. This section does not relieve a
person convicted of a crime described in section 844D‑31(a), or otherwise
subject to this chapter, from the requirement to give buccal swab samples and
print impressions and, if required by the collecting agency's rules or internal
regulations, any blood specimens for the state DNA database and data bank
identification program as described in this chapter. [L 2005, c 112, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next